Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-504 Self-proved will.
(a) A will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proved, by
acknowledgment thereof by the testator and affidavits of the witnesses, each
made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the
state in which execution occurs and evidenced by the officer's certificate,
under official seal, in substantially the following form:

I,
_______________, the testator, sign my name to this instrument this _____ day
of _________, and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned
authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my will and that I sign it
willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it as my
free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that I am
eighteen years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue
influence.

_

Testator

We,
____________, _______________, the witnesses, sign our names to this
instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned
authority that the testator signs and executes this instrument as the
testator's will and that the testator signs it willingly (or willingly directs
another to sign for the testator), and that each of us, in the presence and hearing
of the testator, hereby signs this will as witness to the testator's signing,
and that to the best of our knowledge the testator is eighteen years of age or
older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

_

Witness

_

Witness

The State of ___________

County of ______________

Subscribed,
sworn to and acknowledged before me by _______________, the testator, and
subscribed and sworn to before me by _______________, and _______________,
witness, this _____ day of __________.

(Seal)

(Signed)__

__

(Official capacity of
officer)

(b) An attested will may be made self-proved
at any time after its execution by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator
and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to
administer oaths under the laws of the state in which the acknowledgment occurs
and evidenced by the officer's certificate, under the official seal, attached
or annexed to the will in substantially the following form:

The State of _______________

County of __________________

We,____________,
____________, and _____________, the testator and the witnesses, respectively,
whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument, being first
duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator
signed and executed the instrument as the testator's will and that the testator
had signed willingly (or willingly directed another to sign for the testator),
and that the testator executed it as the testator's free and voluntary act for
the purposes therein expressed, and that each of the witnesses, in the presence
and hearing of the testator, signed the will as witness and that to the best of
the witness' knowledge the testator was at that time eighteen years of age or
older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

______________________

Testator

______________________

Witness

______________________

Witness

Subscribed,
sworn to and acknowledged before me by _______________, the testator, and
subscribed and sworn to before me by _______________, and _______________,
witnesses, this _____ day of __________.

(Seal)

(Signed)__

__

(Official capacity of
officer)

(c) A signature affixed to a self-proving
affidavit attached to a will is considered a signature affixed to the will, if
necessary to prove the will's due execution. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next